Utah statutes.
9-12-203.   Premoratorium customers' eligibility for moratorium -- Criteria.
A residential customer that has had service of an essential utility
discontinued for nonpayment prior to the time the moratorium takes effect
shall have service restored and continued during the period of the moratorium
if the customer meets the requirements of Section 9-12-201 and the customer
has entered into a deferred payment agreement with the utility as to
arrearages.
